Nevada, session 83, AB51.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 239 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, and in
addition to any fee authorized pursuant to NRS 239.052, 239.053
and 239.054, a governmental entity may charge a reasonable fee
for the use of its personnel or technological resources in fulfilling
a request for a copy of a public record.
2. A governmental entity may charge a fee pursuant to
subsection 1 only if the governmental entity adopts a written policy
which:
(a) Provides a method for calculating the fee for the use of its
personnel and technological resources; and
(b) Requires the governmental entity to provide notice to the
requester, in writing, of the amount of the fee for the use of its
personnel and technological resources before preparing the
requested information.
3. As used in this section, “technological resources” means
any information, information system or information service
acquired, developed, operated, maintained or otherwise used by a
governmental entity.
-
*AB51*

– 3 –
Sec. 2. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
-
*AB51*

– 4 –
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
-
*AB51*

– 5 –
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada
2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes of Nevada 2013 and
unless otherwise declared by law to be confidential, all public books
and public records of a governmental entity must be open at all
times during office hours to inspection by any person, and may be
fully copied or an abstract or memorandum may be prepared from
those public books and public records. Any such copies, abstracts or
memoranda may be used to supply the general public with copies,
abstracts or memoranda of the records or may be used in any other
way to the advantage of the governmental entity or of the general
public. This section does not supersede or in any manner affect the
federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge, diminish or affect in
any other manner the rights of a person in any written book or
record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A request to inspect, copy or receive a copy of a public
book or record must:
(a) Be in writing; and
(b) Identify the person requesting to inspect, copy or receive a
copy of a public book or record.
4. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
[4.] 5. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy
of a public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
-
*AB51*

– 6 –
[5.] 6. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity
who has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 3. NRS 239.0107 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.0107 1. Not later than the end of the fifth business day
after the date on which the person who has legal custody or control
of a public book or record of a governmental entity receives a
written [or oral] request from a person to inspect, copy or receive a
copy of the public book or record, a governmental entity shall do
one of the following, as applicable:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, allow the
person to inspect or copy the public book or record or, if the request
is for the person to receive a copy of the public book or record,
provide such a copy to the person.
(b) If the governmental entity does not have legal custody or
control of the public book or record, provide to the person, in
writing:
(1) Notice of the fact that it does not have legal custody or
control of the public book or record; and
(2) The name and address of the governmental entity that has
legal custody or control of the public book or record, if known.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d), if the
governmental entity is unable to make the public book or record
available by the end of the fifth business day after the date on which
the person who has legal custody or control of the public book or
record received the request:
(1) Provide to the person, in writing, notice of the fact that it
is unable to make the public book or record available by that date
and the earliest date and time after which the governmental entity
reasonably believes the public book or record will be available for
the person to inspect or copy or after which a copy of the public
book or record will be available to the person. If the public book or
record or the copy of the public book or record is not available to
the person by that date and time, the governmental entity shall
provide to the person, in writing, an explanation of the reason the
public book or record is not available and a date and time after
which the governmental entity reasonably believes the public book
or record will be available for the person to inspect or copy or after
-
*AB51*

– 7 –
which a copy of the public book or record will be available to the
person.
(2) Make a reasonable effort to assist the requester to focus
the request in such a manner as to maximize the likelihood the
requester will be able to inspect, copy or receive a copy of the
public book or record as expeditiously as possible. The requester
must make a reasonable effort to assist the governmental entity to
focus the request.
(d) If the governmental entity must deny the person’s request
because the public book or record, or a part thereof, is confidential,
provide to the person, in writing:
(1) Notice of that fact; and
(2) A citation to the specific statute or other legal authority
that makes the public book or record, or a part thereof, confidential.
2. If a public book or record of a governmental entity is readily
available for inspection or copying, the person who has legal
custody or control of the public book or record shall allow a person
who has submitted a request to inspect, copy or receive a copy of a
public book or record as expeditiously as practicable.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB51*